Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 2 Administration of State Institutions

40-2-1.
Records of institution residents — Reports of injury or death — Communications to department.

The department of human services shall keep a record showing the name, residence, sex, age, nativity, occupation, condition, and date of entrance or commitment of every inmate, patient, or pupil in the several institutions under the control of the department; the date, cause, and terms of discharge and the condition of the persons at the time of leaving, and also all transfers from one institution to another; and if any inmate, patient, or pupil dies, the date and cause of death. These and other facts as the department may, from time to time, require shall be furnished by the managing officer of each institution to the director of the department of human services within twenty-four (24) hours after the commitment, entrance, death, or discharge of any inmate, patient, or pupil. In case of an accident, injury, or death under peculiar circumstances of an inmate, patient, or pupil, the managing officer shall make a special report within twenty-four (24) hours thereafter to the director, giving the circumstances of the injury or death as fully as possible. The record shall be accessible only to the director of the department, and the officers, agents, and employees thereof, except by permission of the director or upon order of the governor or of a judge of a court of record. Whenever it is required by law that a notice, order, or other communication be made to the department, it shall be a sufficient compliance with the law if the notice, order, or other communication is made to the director of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-2.
Support of families of residents.

The director of human services may contribute to the support of the destitute family of any adult resident of this state, committed to any one of the state institutions under his or her supervision, whenever he or she is satisfied that the destitution has resulted from the commitment; provided, the contributions shall not continue beyond the period of commitment. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary for the payment of contributions, and the state controller shall draw his or her order or orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary for such purpose, upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers signed by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 861, § 4; P.L. 1929, ch. 1382, § 6; P.L. 1932, ch. 1884, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-6

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-3.
Application of funds deposited to care and treatment of residents.

The director of the department of human services shall apply any funds now or hereafter deposited in the name of any discharged or deceased patient or inmate in any institution under the control of the department of human services as partial or full payment, as the case may be, for the care and treatment of the patient or inmate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-7

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-4.
Notice of balance to credit of deceased or discharged resident.

When a balance remains after the payment of the amount due the department of human services for care and treatment, the director shall cause notice of the balance to be mailed, postage prepaid, to each discharged patient or inmate at his or her last known address or to the nearest known next of kin of any deceased patient or inmate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-8

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-5.
Payment of balance to general treasurer.

The balance, as shall remain after the amount due the department of human services for the care and treatment of any discharged or deceased patient or inmate is applied in payment thereof, shall be paid over to the general treasurer by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-9

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-6.
Establishment of right to balance paid to treasurer.

Any person or persons claiming a right to any moneys paid to the general treasurer may establish the right in the same manner as is provided in the case of unclaimed bank deposits in the hands of the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-10

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-7.
Property abandoned by deceased or discharged residents.

All personal property, excepting moneys, that shall have been left by any discharged or deceased patient or inmate in any institution under the control of the department of human services and that, now or hereafter, shall not have been claimed by any of the discharged or deceased patients or inmates, or their next of kin, within one year from the date of discharge or decease, shall be deemed to have been abandoned. All abandoned personal property shall be disposed of as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-11

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 124.

40-2-8.
Transfer of abandoned property to general treasurer.

The director of the department of human services shall order the transfer of abandoned personal property to the state general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-12

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1979, ch. 218, § 1.

40-2-9.
Description of abandoned property transferred.

The director shall, upon ordering transfer of the abandoned personal property, cause to be forwarded to the state general treasurer a list or declaration setting forth the name of each discharged or deceased patient or inmate and a description of each article of personal property abandoned as described in §

40-2-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-13

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1979, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 124.

40-2-10.
Sale of abandoned property — Remission of proceeds.

The state general treasurer, upon receipt of the abandoned personal property and a list or declaration, shall sell the articles at public sale advertised in a manner that, to the general treasurer, shall seem satisfactory, and the general treasurer shall remit the proceeds received from the sale to the director, together with a list or declaration setting forth the amount of money to be credited to the account of each discharged or deceased patient or inmate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-14

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1979, ch. 218, § 1.

40-2-11.
Application of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds from advertised public sale or sales, when received, shall be treated in the same manner as is provided for in §§

40-2-3

—

40-2-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-15

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-12.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-16

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 100, § 1, effective June 17, 2016; P.L. 2016, ch. 109, § 1, effective June 17, 2016.

40-2-13.
Resident physicians and dentists.

The director of the department of human services shall appoint resident physicians, dentists, and other physicians, as may be necessary to give proper attention to the physical and mental welfare of the inmates of the institutions under the control of the department. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to compensate the appointees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 11; P.L. 1920, ch. 1901, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 11; P.L. 1925, ch. 639, § 2; P.L. 1930, ch. 1508, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1888, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, §§ 50, 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-17

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-14.
Examination of inmates for contagious disease — Investigation and report of sources.

The department is hereby authorized and directed, by the attending physician at any of the institutions or by another physician as the director of the department may from time to time designate, to use every available means to ascertain the existence of any dangerous, infectious, or contagious disease, including syphilis in the infectious stages and gonococcus infection, among the inmates, prisoners, patients, and pupils of the institutions, and to make examination of any of them suspected of having syphilis in the infectious stages or gonococcus infection, and immediately to investigate the source of the infection, and, if ascertained, to report the source of the infection to the department of health; and any person committed to or received into any of the institutions by, through, or under any order of court or any process of law shall be deemed to be an inmate, prisoner, patient, or pupil of the institution, as the case may be, within the provisions of §§

40-2-12

—

40-2-17

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-18

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 124.

40-2-15.
Treatment and isolation of diseased residents — Detention after time for release.

Every inmate, prisoner, patient, or pupil in any of the institutions, who has any dangerous, infectious or contagious disease, including syphilis in the infectious stages and gonococcus infection, shall be forthwith placed under medical treatment, and, if in the opinion of the attending physician it is necessary, shall be isolated until danger of contagion has passed or until the attending physician determines that further isolation is unnecessary; and if danger of contagion shall not have passed or if further isolation is still necessary at the expiration of sentence or at the time for discharge or release from the institution, that inmate, prisoner, patient, or pupil shall be detained in the institution and continued under medical treatment until the attending physician shall determine that his or her discharge or release from the institution will not endanger the public health; and during the period of detention, the person so detained shall be supported in the same manner as before the detention.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-19

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 93; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 93.

40-2-16.
Records of venereal disease.

For the statistical purposes of the department of health, the department of human services shall keep records of all cases of venereal diseases in the institutions, but the records shall not be open to public inspection, and the department of human services shall make every reasonable effort to keep secret the identity of those persons with the diseases so far as may be consistent with the enforcement of the provisions of §§

40-2-12

—

40-2-17

and with the protection of the public health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 80, 180; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-20

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 93; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 93.

40-2-17.
Powers as to health of residents.

In carrying out the provisions of §§

40-2-12

—

40-2-16

, the department is hereby vested with full powers of inspection, examination, isolation, and disinfection of all inmates, prisoners, patients, or pupils in any of the institutions, and the powers may be delegated to, and exercised by, any attending physician at any of the institutions or by another physician as the director of the department may from time to time designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 4; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-21

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-18.
Religious instructors and services.

The director of the department of human services shall appoint religious instructors who shall conduct religious services at times and at places within institutions under the control of the department, and who shall perform other duties consistent with their office, as may be required of them by the director of human services. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to compensate the religious instructors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 12; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 12; P.L. 1925, ch. 639, § 3; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-22

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-19.
Tenure of officers — Duties — Time devoted to duty — Holding other offices — Sales to state — Bond.

All officers appointed by the director under this chapter shall hold their respective offices during his or her pleasure, and may be removed and their successors appointed by the director at any time. In addition to the duties prescribed for the officers by law, they shall perform other duties as the director may, from time to time, require not inconsistent with law, and the officers shall make reports and keep records as the director may, from time to time, require in addition to the records and reports that the officers may be required to keep and make by any other provision of law. The officers, except those named in §§

40-2-13

—

40-2-18

, shall give their entire time to the duties of their respective offices, and shall not hold any other state office except that of notary public or any other position of pay or profit in the service of the state, and shall not furnish for pay or profit any materials, merchandise, or supplies to the state. The director may require any of the officers to give bond to the state for the faithful performance of their duties in a sum and with surety as to the director may seem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 19; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-23

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 124.

40-2-20.
Compensation of officers and employees.

The director shall fix the compensation of the officers and employees of the several institutions appointed under the authority of this chapter, and of the other institutions under his or her control, within the sum or sums appropriated to be expended for the purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-24

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-21.
Reports on schools in institutions — Inspections — Qualifications of teachers.

The director of the department of human services shall annually make to the department of elementary and secondary education in the month of July, a report of all the schools maintained in the institutions under its control, the report to be in the manner and form as prescribed by law for other educational institutions. The council on elementary and secondary education may visit and inspect the schools and make suggestions to the director of the department of human services for the improvement of them, as it may deem advisable. All teachers employed in the schools shall hold certificates of qualification as required by law of public school teachers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-28; P.L. 1960, ch. 73, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-22.
Departmental seal.

The department shall have a seal that shall have engraved thereon the words “department of human services, state of Rhode Island,” and the seal shall be affixed to all written contracts that the department is authorized and directed to make under the provisions of this chapter, and the contracts shall be signed by the director of the department. The seal shall also be affixed to other orders and papers issued by the department as the department may by rule or order direct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-29; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-23.
Annual report to general assembly.

The director shall make an annual report to the general assembly during the month of January, setting forth:

The condition and needs of the several institutions under his or her control; the number of inmates in each institution; and an abstract of all reports received from officers incident to the performance of their duties.

A complete financial statement of the several institutions, together with estimates of the amounts required for the ensuing year, for salaries and pay, for construction and repairs, and for all other expenses of maintenance.

Information and recommendations as to the director may seem proper for the efficient administration and development of the several institutions, and for promoting the physical, mental, and moral welfare of the inmates thereof, and for measures whereby the number of prospective inmates may be decreased and the number of past inmates kept from returning may be increased, and for any additional legislation needed for these purposes.

Other information or recommendations as may be requested by the governor or by the general assembly.

The annual report shall be made a matter of public record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 21; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 10; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-30; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-2-24.
Prohibition against duplication of keys.

Every key for maximum security units of the several institutions under the control of the department of human services shall contain embossed thereon the state seal with the words “do not duplicate,” and whoever reproduces or causes to be reproduced any key without a written order from the director of human services shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 138, § 1; Reorg. G.L. 1956, § 40-2-31; Plan No. 1, 1970.